Colorado, session 2026A, HB1344.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-290-105, amend (4)
as follows:
12-290-105. Appointment of members of podiatry board - terms
- review of functions - repeal of article.
(4) This article 290 is repealed, effective September 1, 2026 2035.
Before the repeal, the functions of the board are scheduled for review in
accordance with section 24-34-104.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 12-290-125 as
follows:
12-290-125. Protection of medical records by podiatrists -
verification of compliance - noncompliance grounds for discipline -
rules.
(1) EACH LICENSED PODIATRIST SHALL DEVELOP A WRITTEN PLAN TO
ENSURE THE SECURITY OF PATIENT MEDICAL RECORDS. THE PLAN MUST
ADDRESS AT LEAST THE FOLLOWING:
(a) THE STORAGE AND PROPER DISPOSAL, IF APPROPRIATE, OF
PATIENT MEDICAL RECORDS;
(b) THE DISPOSITION OF PATIENT MEDICAL RECORDS IN THE EVENT
THE LICENSEE DIES, RETIRES, OR OTHERWISE CEASES TO PRACTICE OR
PROVIDE MEDICAL CARE TO PATIENTS; AND
(c) THE METHOD BY WHICH A PATIENT MAY ACCESS OR OBTAIN THE
PATIENT'S MEDICAL RECORDS PROMPTLY IF ANY OF THE EVENTS DESCRIBED
IN SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS SECTION OCCUR.
(2) UPON INITIAL LICENSURE UNDER THIS ARTICLE 290 AND UPON
RENEWAL OF A LICENSE, AN APPLICANT OR LICENSEE, AS APPLICABLE, SHALL
ATTEST TO THE BOARD THAT THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE HAS DEVELOPED
A PLAN IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(3) A LICENSEE SHALL INFORM EACH PATIENT, IN WRITING, OF THE
METHOD BY WHICH THE PATIENT MAY ACCESS OR OBTAIN THE PATIENT'S
MEDICAL RECORDS IF AN EVENT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS
SECTION OCCURS.
(4) A LICENSEE WHO FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION IS
SUBJECT TO DISCIPLINE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 12-290-113.
(5) THE BOARD MAY ADOPT RULES AS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, repeal
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1344

(27)(a)(VIII); and add (36)(a)(VII) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies and
functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(27) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2026:
(VIII) The Colorado podiatry board created in article 290 of title 12;
(36) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2035:
(VII) THE COLORADO PODIATRY BOARD CREATED IN ARTICLE 290 OF
TITLE 12.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1344

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1344